District of Columbia statutes.
50-2201.24

Office of Registrar of Titles and Tags.

The employee of the Department of Transportation who is charged with the immediate responsibility for, and exercises supervision over, the issuance of tags and certificates of title and the registration of motor vehicles and trailers shall be known as the Registrar of Titles and Tags.

June 28, 1944, 58 Stat. 527, ch. 300, § 1
1981 Ed., § 40-707.
1973 Ed., § 40-603a.
Department of Vehicles and Traffic abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 50-2201.03.